Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.01, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Public notice. "Public notice" means every notice required or authorized by law or by order of a court to be published deleted text begin by a qualified newspaperdeleted text end new text begin in accordance with this chapternew text end , and includes: (1) every publication of laws, ordinances, resolutions, financial information, and proceedings intended to give notice in a particular area; (2) every notice and certificate of election, facsimile ballot, notice of referendum, notice of public hearing before a governmental body, and notice of meetings of private and public bodies required by law; (3) every summons, order, citation, notice of sale or other notice which is intended to inform a person that the person may or shall do an act or exercise a right within a designated period or upon or by a designated date; and (4) this subdivision contains no independent requirement for the publication of any public notice. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.01, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Publish. "Publish" means dissemination in the print edition of a qualified newspaper, and in the e-edition of the qualified newspaper if applicablenew text begin , or publication on a political subdivision's websitenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Website. new text end new text begin "Website" means a specific, addressable location provided on a server connected to the Internet and hosting World Wide Web pages and other files that are generally accessible on the Internet all or most of the day. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.03, is amended to read: 331A.03 WHERE NOTICE PUBLISHED. Subdivision 1. Generally. Except as provided in subdivision 2, a public notice shall be published in a qualified newspaperdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin or on the political subdivision's website in accordance with section 331A.12.new text end Except as otherwise provided by law, new text begin publication in a qualified newspaper must be made new text end in one that is likely to give notice in the affected area or to whom it is directed. When a statute or other law requires publication in a newspaper located in a designated political subdivision or area and no qualified newspaper is located there, publication shall be made in a qualified newspaper likely to give notice unless the particular statute or law expressly provides otherwisenew text begin , or publication may be made on the political subdivision's website in accordance with section 331A.12new text end . If no qualified newspaper exists, then publication deleted text begin is not requireddeleted text end new text begin must be made on the political subdivision's website or on the Minnesota Newspaper Association's statewide public notice website, if the political subdivision does not have a websitenew text end . Subd. 2. Exception; certain cities of the fourth class. A public notice required to be published by a statutory or home rule charter city of the fourth class located in the metropolitan area defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, is not required to be published in a qualified newspaper if there is no qualified nondaily newspaper of general circulation in the city, provided the notice is printed in a newsletter or similar printed means of giving notice that is prepared by the city and either mailed or delivered to each household in the citynew text begin , or the notice is published on the city's website in accordance with section 331A.12new text end . Subd. 3. Alternative dissemination of bids and requests. (a) new text begin For a political subdivision that designates publication in a qualified newspaper as its means of dissemination, new text end in addition to or as an alternative to the statutory requirements for newspaper publication, a political subdivision may disseminate solicitations of bids, requests for information, and requests for proposals by a means authorized in paragraph (b), if the political subdivision simultaneously publishes, either as part of the minutes of a regular meeting of the governing body or in a separate notice published in the official newspaper, a description of all solicitations or requests so disseminated, along with the means by which the dissemination occurred. (b) A political subdivision may use its website or recognized industry trade journals as an alternative means of dissemination. A dissemination by alternative means must be in substantially the same format and for the same period of time as a publication required by this chapter. (c) For the first six months after a political subdivision designates an alternative means of disseminationnew text begin under this subdivisionnew text end , it must continue to publish solicitation of bids, requests for information, and requests for proposals in the official newspaper in addition to the alternative method. The publication in the official newspaper must indicate where to find the designated alternative method. After the expiration of the six-month period, an alternative means of dissemination satisfies the publication requirements of law for solicitation of bids, requests for information, and requests for proposals. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Priority. new text begin (a) new text end The governing body of a political subdivision, when authorized or required by statute or charter to designate a newspaper for publication of its public notices, shall designate a qualified newspaper in the following priority. new text begin (b) This section does not apply to a political subdivision that designates website publication under section 331A.12 as its means of dissemination. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Maximum rate. The maximum rate charged for publication of a public noticenew text begin in a qualified newspapernew text end shall not exceed the lowest classified rate paid by commercial users for comparable space in the newspapers in which the public notice appears, and shall include all cash discounts, multiple insertion discounts, and similar benefits extended to the newspaper's regular customers. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.08, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Publication of proceedings. Notwithstanding other statutory publication requirements, if the governing body of a political subdivision conducts regular meetings not more than once every 30 days, the governing body need not publish the meeting minutes in the official newspaper new text begin or on the political subdivision's website new text end until ten days after the proceedings have been approved by the governing body. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.09, is amended to read: 331A.09 PUBLICATION ON SUNDAY OR HOLIDAY. Any public notice may lawfully be printed in a newspaper new text begin or on a political subdivision's website new text end published on a Sunday or holiday. Any notice that, by law or the order of any court, is required to be published for any given number of weeks may be published on any day in each week of the term, and if published as many weeks and as many times in each week as required by the law or order, it is a lawful publication. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 331A.10, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Discontinuance. (a) When a newspaper ceases to be published before the publication of a public notice is commenced, or when commenced ceases before the publication is completed, the following procedures apply: (1) when the publication is required by court order, the order for publication may be amended by order of the court or judge, to designate another newspaper, as may be necessary; or (2) when the publication is required by law, rule, or ordinance, the publication may be made or completed in any other qualified newspaper. (b) If no qualified newspaper is available for publication of a public notice after the discontinuance of a newspaper, the political subdivision must post the information required to be published on the political subdivision's website until another qualified newspaper is identified, which shall then be designated. During the time when no qualified newspaper is available, the political subdivision must also post the public notice on the Minnesota Newspaper Association's statewide public notice website, at no additional cost to the political subdivision. (c) Any time during which the notice is published in a newspaper prior to the newspaper's discontinuance shall be calculated as a part of the time required for the publication, proof of which may be made by affidavit of any person acquainted with the facts. new text begin (d) This section does not apply to a political subdivision that designates website publication under section 331A.12 as the political subdivision's means of dissemination. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.11, is amended to read: 331A.11 APPLICATION. Subdivision 1. Application. Sections 331A.01 to deleted text begin 331A.11deleted text end new text begin 331A.12new text end apply to all political subdivisions of the state. Subd. 2. Notices excluded. Sections 331A.01 to deleted text begin 331A.11deleted text end new text begin 331A.12new text end do not apply to notices required by private agreements or local laws to be published deleted text begin in newspapersdeleted text end , unless they refer expressly or by implication to this chapter or to particular provisions of this chapter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Designation. At the meeting of the governing body of a political subdivision at which the governing body designates its deleted text begin official newspaper for the yeardeleted text end new text begin means of disseminationnew text end , the governing body may designate deleted text begin in the same mannerdeleted text end publication of deleted text begin transportation projectsdeleted text end new text begin public noticesnew text end on the political subdivision's website. new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, new text end publication on the website may be used in place of or in addition to any other required form of publication. Each year after designating publication on the website for deleted text begin transportation projectsdeleted text end new text begin public noticesnew text end , the political subdivision must publish, deleted text begin in a qualified newspaper in the jurisdictiondeleted text end new text begin on the Minnesota Newspaper Association's statewide public notice websitenew text end and on the new text begin political subdivision's new text end website, notice that the political subdivision will deleted text begin publish any advertisements for bids on its websitedeleted text end new text begin only publish public notices on its websitenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.12, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Form, time for publication same. A political subdivision that publishesnew text begin public noticesnew text end on its website under this section must post the information in substantially the same format and for the same period of time as required for publication in an official newspaper or other print publication. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 331A.12, subdivision 1, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07130 331A.12 WEBSITE ADVERTISEMENT FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECT BIDS. Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The terms defined in this subdivision and section 331A.01 apply to this section. (b) "Website" means a specific, addressable location provided on a server connected to the Internet and hosting World Wide Web pages and other files that are generally accessible on the Internet all or most of the day.